Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advisory committee" means the orthotics and prosthetics advisory committee.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(4) "Orthotics" means the science and practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, an orthosis for the support, correction, or alleviation of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury, or deformity. The practice of orthotics encompasses evaluation, treatment, and consultation. With basic observational gait and postural analysis, orthotists assess and design orthoses to maximize function and provide not only the support but the alignment necessary to either prevent or correct deformity or to improve the safety and efficiency of mobility or locomotion, or both. Orthotic practice includes providing continuing patient care in order to assess its effect on the patient's tissues and to assure proper fit and function of the orthotic device by periodic evaluation.

(5) "Orthotist" means a person licensed to practice orthotics under this chapter.

(6) "Orthosis" means a custom-fabricated, definitive brace or support that is designed for long-term use. Except for the treatment of scoliosis, orthosis does not include prefabricated or direct-formed orthotic devices, as defined in this section, or any of the following assistive technology devices: Commercially available knee orthoses used following injury or surgery; spastic muscle tone-inhibiting orthoses; upper extremity adaptive equipment; finger splints; hand splints; custom-made, leather wrist gauntlets; face masks used following burns; wheelchair seating that is an integral part of the wheelchair and not worn by the patient independent of the wheelchair; fabric or elastic supports; corsets; arch supports, also known as foot orthotics; low-temperature formed plastic splints; trusses; elastic hose; canes; crutches; cervical collars; dental appliances; and other similar devices as determined by the secretary, such as those commonly carried in stock by a pharmacy, department store, corset shop, or surgical supply facility. Prefabricated orthoses, also known as custom-fitted, or off-the-shelf, are devices that are manufactured as commercially available stock items for no specific patient. Direct-formed orthoses are devices formed or shaped during the molding process directly on the patient's body or body segment. Custom-fabricated orthoses, also known as custom-made orthoses, are devices designed and fabricated, in turn, from raw materials for a specific patient and require the generation of an image, form, or mold that replicates the patient's body or body segment and, in turn, involves the rectification of dimensions, contours, and volumes to achieve proper fit, comfort, and function for that specific patient.

(7) "Prosthetics" means the science and practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, aligning, adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, a prosthesis through the replacement of external parts of a human body lost due to amputation or congenital deformities or absences. The practice of prosthetics also includes the generation of an image, form, or mold that replicates the patient's body or body segment and that requires rectification of dimensions, contours, and volumes for use in the design and fabrication of a socket to accept a residual anatomic limb to, in turn, create an artificial appendage that is designed either to support body weight or to improve or restore function or cosmesis, or both. Involved in the practice of prosthetics is observational gait analysis and clinical assessment of the requirements necessary to refine and mechanically fix the relative position of various parts of the prosthesis to maximize the function, stability, and safety of the patient. The practice of prosthetics includes providing continuing patient care in order to assess the prosthetic device's effect on the patient's tissues and to assure proper fit and function of the prosthetic device by periodic evaluation.

(8) "Prosthetist" means a person who is licensed to practice prosthetics under this chapter.

(9) "Prosthesis" means a definitive artificial limb that is alignable or articulated, or, in lower extremity applications, capable of weight bearing. Prosthesis means an artificial medical device that is not surgically implanted and that is used to replace a missing limb, appendage, or other external human body part including an artificial limb, hand, or foot. The term does not include artificial eyes, ears, fingers or toes, dental appliances, ostomy products, devices such as artificial breasts, eyelashes, wigs, or other devices as determined by the secretary that do not have a significant impact on the musculoskeletal functions of the body. In the lower extremity of the body, the term prosthesis does not include prostheses required for amputations distal to and including the transmetatarsal level. In the upper extremity of the body, the term prosthesis does not include prostheses that are provided to restore function for amputations distal to and including the carpal level.

(10) "Authorized health care practitioner" means licensed physicians, physician's assistants, osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, naturopaths, podiatric physicians and surgeons, dentists, and *advanced registered nurse practitioners.

[ 1997 c 285 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.